Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6834SV (2) 91 da/js S.F. 2337 Section 1. Section 459.102, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. âAnimalâ means cattle, swine, horses, sheep, chickens, 3 turkeys, or fish , or shellfish . 4 Sec. 2. Section 459.102, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraphs: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . n. Shellfish weighing twenty-five 7 grams or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.001 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Shellfish weighing less than 9 twenty-five grams . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00006 10 Sec. 3. Section 459.320, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 459.320 Exception from regulation ââ election for confinement 13 feeding operations confining fish or shellfish . 14 A person who exclusively confines fish or shellfish as part 15 of a confinement feeding operation may elect to comply with 16 the permitting requirements of section 455B.183 in lieu of the 17 permitting requirements of this subchapter . 18